Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-533
Inclusion; map or plat; certificate; report; transmitted to county board; duties; district in more than one county; hearing; boundaries; determination.

(1) Within thirty days after receiving the petition, map or plat, and certificate of the county clerk, in accordance with section 35-532, the board of directors of the district and the city council or village board shall transmit the petition, map or plat, and certificate to the proper county board, accompanied by a report in writing approving or disapproving the proposal contained in the petition, or approving such proposal in part and disapproving it in part.

(2) Within thirty days after receiving the resolution or ordinance, map or plat, and certificate of the county clerk, the board of directors of the district and the city council or village board shall transmit the resolution or ordinance, map or plat, and certificate to the proper county board.

(3) If the proposed district will be situated within two or more counties, the county clerk of the county in which the largest number of petitioners have signed or, in the case of a joint resolution or ordinance, the county containing the greatest number of registered voters, shall confer with the clerk or clerks of the other county or counties concerned and shall obtain a certificate as to the adequacy of the petitions, resolutions, or ordinances pertaining to such county or counties, and thereafter he or she shall designate a time and place for a hearing before a joint meeting of the county boards of all counties in which the proposed district is to be situated. Notice of such hearing shall be given by publication two weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, the last publication appearing at least seven days prior to the hearing. The notice shall be addressed to "all registered voters residing in the following boundaries" and shall include a description of the proposed boundaries as set forth in the petition, resolution, or ordinance. At the time and place so fixed, the county board or boards shall meet and all persons shall have an opportunity to be heard respecting the inclusion or the location of the boundaries of the district. Within forty-five days after such hearing, the county board or boards shall determine whether the proposed district is suited to the general fire protection policy of the county, or each of such counties, as a whole, determine the boundaries of the proposed district, and make a written order of such determination which shall describe the boundaries of the district and be filed in the office of the county clerk or clerks of each county in which such district is situated.

Laws 1978, LB 907, § 4;

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 23.